Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.370

Disciplinary action—Director's delegation of authority.

The director may authorize one or more assistants to perform the director's duties with reference to disciplinary action.

[ 2008 c 23 s 33; 1988 c 205 s 6; 1987 c 332 s 10; 1957 c 52 s 45. Prior: 1945 c 111 s 9, part; 1941 c 252 s 20, part; 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 14, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 8340-43, part. Formerly RCW 18.85.240.]